Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.060

Fraudulent registration of trademark.

Every person who shall for himself or herself, or on behalf of any other person, corporation, association, or union, procure the filing of any label, trademark, term, design, device, or form of advertisement, with the secretary of state by any fraudulent means, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 289; 1909 c 249 s 347; RRS s 2599.]

NOTES:

Trademark registration: Chapter 19.77 RCW.